createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_aa.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nibaayaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: nibaayan  
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl: nibaayaang 
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl: nibaayang 
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: nibaayeg
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: nibaad
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: nibaawaad
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: nibaanid
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: nibaanid
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: nibaang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: nibaasiwaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: nibaasiwan 
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl: nibaasiwaang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl: nibaasiwang
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: nibaasiweg
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: nibaasig
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: nibaasigwaa
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: nibaasinig
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: nibaasinig
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: nibaasing
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: nibaayaambaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: nibaayamban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl: nibaayaangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl: nibaayangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: nibaayegiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: nibaapan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: nibaawaapan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: nibaanipan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: nibaanipan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: nibaangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg: nibaasiwaambaan
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg: nibaasiwamban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl: nibaasiwaangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl: nibaasiwangiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl: nibaasiwegiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: nibaasigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: nibaasigwaaban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: nibaasinigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: nibaasinigoban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X: nibaasingiban
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: nibaawaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: nibaawanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl: nibaawaangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl: nibaawangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: nibaawegwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: nibaagwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: nibaawaagwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: nibaanigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: nibaanigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: nibaawiingen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg: nibaasiiwaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg: nibaasiiwanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl: nibaasiiwaangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl: nibaasiiwangen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl: nibaasiiwegwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: nibaasiigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: nibaasiiwaagwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: nibaasiinigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: nibaasiinigwen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X: nibaasiiwiingen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+1Sg: nibaawaambaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Sg: nibaawambanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+Excl: nibaawaangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+Incl: nibaawangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+2Pl: nibaawegibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3SgProx: nibaagobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3PlProx: nibaawaagobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3SgObv: nibaanigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+3PlObv: nibaanigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+X: nibaawiingibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+1Sg: nibaasiiwaambaanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Sg: nibaasiiwambanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+Excl: nibaasiiwaangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+Incl: nibaasiiwangibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+2Pl: nibaasiiwegibanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3SgProx: nibaasiigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3PlProx: nibaasiiwaagobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3SgObv: nibaasiinigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+3PlObv: nibaasiinigobanen
     nibaa+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+X: nibaasiiwiingibanen
